Illinois, session 104th, SB2875.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 10. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Consumer Data Privacy Act. 6    Section 11. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    (a) "Affiliate" means a legal entity that controls, is 8controlled by, or is under common control with another legal 9entity. As used in this definition, "control" or "controlled" 10means: ownership of or the power to vote more than 50% of the 11outstanding shares of any class of voting security of a 12company; control in any manner over the election of a majority 13of the directors or of individuals exercising similar 14functions; or the power to exercise a controlling influence 15over the management of a company.16    (b) "Authenticate" means to use reasonable means to 17determine that a request to exercise any of the rights under 18Section 14, subsection (1), paragraphs (b) to (h), is being 19made by or rightfully on behalf of the consumer who is entitled 20to exercise the rights with respect to the personal data at 21issue.22    (c) "Biometric data" means data generated by automatic 23measurements of an individual's biological characteristics,   SB2875- 2 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1including a fingerprint, a voiceprint, eye retinas, irises, or 2other unique biological patterns or characteristics that are 3used to identify a specific individual. Biometric data does 4not include:5        (1) a digital or physical photograph;6        (2) an audio or video recording; or7        (3) any data generated from a digital or physical 8    photograph, or an audio or video recording, unless the 9    data is generated to identify a specific individual.10    (d) "Child" has the meaning given in United States Code, 11Title 15, Section 6501.12    (e) "Consent" means any freely given, specific, informed, 13and unambiguous indication of the consumer's wishes by which 14the consumer signifies agreement to the processing of personal 15data relating to the consumer. Acceptance of general or broad 16terms of use or similar document that contains descriptions of 17personal data processing along with other, unrelated 18information does not constitute consent. Hovering over, 19muting, pausing, or closing a given piece of content does not 20constitute consent. A consent is not valid when the consumer's 21indication has been obtained by a dark pattern. A consumer may 22revoke consent previously given consistent with this Act.23    (f) "Consumer" means a natural person who is an Illinois 24resident acting only in an individual or household context. 25Consumer does not include a natural person acting in a 26commercial or employment context.  SB2875- 3 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1    (g) "Controller" means the natural or legal person who, 2alone or jointly with others, determines the purposes and 3means of the processing of personal data.4    (h) "Decisions that produce legal or similarly significant 5effects concerning the consumer" means decisions made by the 6controller that result in the provision or denial by the 7controller of financial or lending services, housing, 8insurance, education enrollment or opportunity, criminal 9justice, employment opportunities, health care services, or 10access to essential goods or services.11    (i) "Dark pattern" means a user interface designed or 12manipulated with the substantial effect of subverting or 13impairing user autonomy, decision making, or choice. 14    (j) "Deidentified data" means data that cannot reasonably 15be used to infer information about or otherwise be linked to an 16identified or identifiable natural person or a device linked 17to an identified or identifiable natural person, provided that 18the controller that possesses the data:19        (1) takes reasonable measures to ensure that the data 20    cannot be associated with a natural person;21        (2) publicly commits to process the data only in a 22    deidentified fashion and not attempt to reidentify the 23    data; and24        (3) contractually obligates any recipients of the 25    information to comply with all provisions of this 26    definition.  SB2875- 4 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1    (k) "Delete" means to remove or destroy information so 2that it is not maintained in human- or machine-readable form 3and cannot be retrieved or used in the ordinary course of 4business.5    (l) "Genetic information" means information about an 6identifiable individual derived from the presence, absence, 7alteration, or mutation of a gene, or the presence or absence 8of a specific DNA or RNA marker, which has been obtained from 9an analysis of:10        (1) the individual's biological information or 11    specimen; or12        (2) the biological information or specimen of a person 13    to whom the individual is related.14    "Genetic information" also means medical or biological 15information collected from an individual about a particular 16genetic condition that is or might be used to provide medical 17care to that individual or the individual's family members.18    (m) "Identified or identifiable natural person" means a 19person who can be readily identified, directly or indirectly.20    (n) "Known child" means a person under circumstances in 21which a controller has actual knowledge of, or willfully 22disregards, that the person is under 13 years of age.23    (o) "Personal data" means any information that is linked 24or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable 25natural person. Personal data does not include deidentified 26data or publicly available information. As used in this   SB2875- 5 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1definition, "publicly available information" means information 2that (1) is lawfully made available from federal, state, or 3local government records or widely distributed media; or (2) a 4controller has a reasonable basis to believe has lawfully been 5made available to the general public.6    (p) "Process" or "processing" means any operation or set 7of operations that are performed on personal data or on sets of 8personal data, whether or not by automated means, including, 9but not limited to, the collection, use, storage, disclosure, 10analysis, deletion, or modification of personal data.11    (q) "Processor" means a natural or legal person who 12processes personal data on behalf of a controller.13    (r) "Profiling" means any form of automated processing of 14personal data to evaluate, analyze, or predict personal 15aspects related to an identified or identifiable natural 16person's economic situation, health, personal preferences, 17interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements.18    (s) "Pseudonymous data" means personal data that cannot be 19attributed to a specific natural person without the use of 20additional information, provided that the additional 21information is kept separately and is subject to appropriate 22technical and organizational measures to ensure that the 23personal data are not attributed to an identified or 24identifiable natural person.25    (t) "Sale", "sell", or "sold" means the exchange of 26personal data for monetary or other valuable consideration by   SB2875- 6 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1the controller to a third party. "Sale" does not include the 2following:3        (1) the disclosure of personal data to a processor who 4    processes the personal data on behalf of the controller;5        (2) the disclosure of personal data to a third party 6    for purposes of providing a product or service requested 7    by the consumer;8        (3) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to an 9    affiliate of the controller; 10        (4) the disclosure of information that the consumer 11    intentionally made available to the general public via a 12    channel of mass media and did not restrict to a specific 13    audience;14        (5) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to a 15    third party as an asset that is part of a completed or 16    proposed merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or other 17    transaction in which the third party assumes control of 18    all or part of the controller's assets; or19        (6) the exchange of personal data between the producer 20    of a good or service and authorized agents of the producer 21    who sell and service the goods and services to enable the 22    cooperative provisioning of goods and services by both the 23    producer and the producer's agents.24    (u) "Sensitive data" is a form of personal data. 25"Sensitive data" means:26        (1) personal data revealing racial or ethnic origin,   SB2875- 7 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1    religious beliefs, mental or physical health condition or 2    diagnosis, sexual orientation, or citizenship or 3    immigration status;4        (2) the processing of biometric data or genetic 5    information for the purpose of uniquely identifying an 6    individual;7        (3) the personal data of a known child; or8        (4) specific geolocation data.9    (v) "Specific geolocation data" means information derived 10from technology, including, but not limited to, global 11positioning system level latitude and longitude coordinates or 12other mechanisms that directly identifies the geographic 13coordinates of a consumer or a device linked to a consumer with 14an accuracy of more than 3 decimal degrees of latitude and 15longitude or the equivalent in an alternative geographic 16coordinate system or a street address derived from the 17coordinates. Specific geolocation data does not include the 18content of communications, the contents of databases 19containing street address information that are accessible to 20the public as authorized by law, or any data generated by or 21connected to advanced utility metering infrastructure systems 22or other equipment for use by a public utility.23    (w) "Targeted advertising" means displaying advertisements 24to a consumer in which the advertisement is selected based on 25personal data obtained or inferred from the consumer's 26activities over time and across nonaffiliated websites or   SB2875- 8 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1online applications to predict the consumer's preferences or 2interests. Targeted advertising does not include:3        (1) advertising based on activities within a 4    controller's own websites or online applications;5        (2) advertising based on the context of a consumer's 6    current search query or visit to a website or online 7    application;8        (3) advertising to a consumer in response to the 9    consumer's request for information or feedback; or10        (4) processing personal data solely for measuring or 11    reporting advertising performance, reach, or frequency.12    "Technology provider" means a person who:13        (1) contracts with a public educational agency or 14    institution, as part of a one-to-one program or otherwise, 15    to provide a school-issued device for student use; and16        (2) creates, receives, or maintains educational data 17    pursuant or incidental to a contract with a public 18    educational agency or institution.19    (x) "Third party" means a natural or legal person, public 20authority, agency, or body other than the consumer, 21controller, processor, or an affiliate of the processor or the 22controller.23    (y) "Trade secret" means information, including a formula, 24pattern, compilation, program, device, method, technique, or 25process, that:26        (1) derives independent economic value, actual or   SB2875- 9 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1    potential, from not being generally known to, and not 2    being readily ascertainable by proper means by, other 3    persons who can obtain economic value from its disclosure 4    or use, and5        (2) is the subject of efforts that are reasonable 6    under the circumstances to maintain its secrecy.7    The existence of a trade secret is not negated merely 8because an employee or other person has acquired the trade 9secret without express or specific notice that it is a trade 10secret if, under all the circumstances, the employee or other 11person knows or has reason to know that the owner intends or 12expects the secrecy of the type of information comprising the 13trade secret to be maintained. 14    Section 12. Scope; exclusions. 15    (a)(1) Scope. This Act applies to legal entities that 16conduct business in Illinois or produce products or services 17that are targeted to Illinois residents, and that satisfy one 18or more of the following thresholds:19        (A) during a calendar year, controls or processes 20    personal data of 100,000 consumers or more, excluding 21    personal data controlled or processed solely for the 22    purpose of completing a payment transaction; or23        (B) derives over 25% of gross revenue from the sale of 24    personal data and processes or controls personal data of 25    25,000 consumers or more.  SB2875- 10 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1    (2) A controller or processor shall comply with the 2Student Online Personal Protection Act, except that when the 3provisions of that Act conflict with this Act, the Consumer 4Data Privacy Act prevails.5    (b) Exclusions. The provisions of this Act do not apply to 6the following entities, activities, or types of information:7        (1) the State, a political subdivision of the State, 8    and units of local government;9        (2) a federally recognized Indian tribe;10        (3) information that meets the definition of:11            (A) protected health information, as defined by 12        and for purposes of the Health Insurance Portability 13        and Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, 14        and related regulations;15            (B) health records, that includes, but is not 16        limited to, any information, whether oral or recorded 17        in any form or medium, that relates to the past, 18        present, or future physical or mental health or 19        condition of a patient; the provision of health care 20        to a patient; or the past, present, or future payment 21        for the provision of health care to a patient;22            (C) patient identifying information for purposes 23        of Code of Federal Regulations, Title 42, Part 2, 24        established pursuant to the United States Code, Title 25        42, Section 290dd-2;26            (D) identifiable private information for purposes   SB2875- 11 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1        of the federal policy for the protection of human 2        subjects, the Code of Federal Regulations, Title 45, 3        Part 46; identifiable private information that is 4        otherwise information collected as part of human 5        subjects research under the good clinical practice 6        guidelines issued by the International Council for 7        Harmonisation; the protection of human subjects under 8        the Code of Federal Regulations, Title 21, Parts 50 9        and 56; or personal data used or shared in research 10        conducted in accordance with one or more of the 11        requirements set forth in this paragraph;12            (E) information and documents created for purposes 13        of the federal Health Care Quality Improvement Act of 14        1986, Public Law 99-660, and related regulations; or15            (F) patient safety work product for purposes of 16        Code of Federal Regulations, Title 42, Part 3, 17        established under the United States Code, Title 42, 18        Sections 299b-21 to 299b-26;19        (4) information that is derived from any of the health 20    care-related information listed in clause (3), but that 21    has been deidentified in accordance with the requirements 22    for deidentification set forth in the Code of Federal 23    Regulations, Title 45, Part 164; 24        (5) information originating from, and intermingled to 25    be indistinguishable with, any of the health care-related 26    information listed in clause (3) that is maintained by:  SB2875- 12 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1            (A) a covered entity or business associate, as 2        defined by the Health Insurance Portability and 3        Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and 4        related regulations;5            (B) a health care provider, to include, but not be 6        limited to, any public or private facility that 7        provides, on an inpatient or outpatient basis, 8        preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, convalescent, 9        rehabilitation, mental health, or intellectual 10        disability services, including general or special 11        hospitals, skilled nursing homes, extended care 12        facilities, intermediate care facilities and mental 13        health centers; or14            (C) a program or a qualified service organization, 15        as defined by Code of Federal Regulations, Title 42, 16        Part 2, established pursuant to United States Code, 17        Title 42, Section 290dd-2;18        (6) information that is:19            (A) maintained by an entity that meets the 20        definition of health care provider under the Code of 21        Federal Regulations, Title 45, Section 160.103, to the 22        extent that the entity maintains the information in 23        the manner required of covered entities with respect 24        to protected health information for purposes of the 25        Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 26        1996, Public Law 104-191, and related regulations;  SB2875- 13 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1            (B) included in a limited data set, as described 2        under the Code of Federal Regulations, Title 45, Part 3        164.514(e), to the extent that the information is 4        used, disclosed, and maintained in the manner 5        specified by that part;6            (C) maintained by, or maintained to comply with 7        the rules or orders of, a self-regulatory organization 8        as defined by the United States Code, Title 15, 9        Section 78c(a)(26);10            (D) originated from, or intermingled with, 11        information described in clause (9) and that a 12        residential mortgage originator or residential 13        mortgage servicer regulated under the Residential 14        Mortgage License Act of 1987 collects, processes, 15        uses, or maintains in the same manner as required 16        under the laws and regulations specified in clause 17        (9); or18            (E) originated from, or intermingled with, 19        information described in clause (9) and that a nonbank 20        financial institution collects, processes, uses, or 21        maintains in the same manner as required under the 22        laws and regulations specified in clause (9);23        (7) information used only for public health activities 24    and purposes, as described under the Code of Federal 25    Regulations, Title 45, Part 164.512;26        (8) an activity involving the collection, maintenance,   SB2875- 14 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1    disclosure, sale, communication, or use of any personal 2    data bearing on a consumer's credit worthiness, credit 3    standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, 4    personal characteristics, or mode of living by a consumer 5    reporting agency, as defined in the United States Code, 6    Title 15, Section 1681a(f), by a furnisher of information, 7    as set forth in the United States Code, Title 15, Section 8    1681s-2, who provides information for use in a consumer 9    report, as defined in the United States Code, Title 15, 10    Section 1681a(d), and by a user of a consumer report, as 11    set forth in the United States Code, Title 15, Section 12    1681b, except that information is only excluded under this 13    paragraph to the extent that the activity involving the 14    collection, maintenance, disclosure, sale, communication, 15    or use of the information by the agency, furnisher, or 16    user is subject to regulation under the federal Fair 17    Credit Reporting Act, United States Code, Title 15, 18    Sections 1681 to 1681x, and the information is not 19    collected, maintained, used, communicated, disclosed, or 20    sold except as authorized by the Fair Credit Reporting 21    Act;22        (9) personal data collected, processed, sold, or 23    disclosed under the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, Public 24    Law 106-102, and implementing regulations, if the 25    collection, processing, sale, or disclosure is in 26    compliance with that law;   SB2875- 15 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1        (10) personal data collected, processed, sold, or 2    disclosed pursuant to the federal Driver's Privacy 3    Protection Act of 1994, United States Code, Title 18, 4    Sections 2721 to 2725, if the collection, processing, 5    sale, or disclosure is in compliance with that law;6        (11) personal data regulated by the federal Family 7    Educational Rights and Privacy Act, United States Code, 8    Title 20, Section 1232g, and implementing regulations;9        (12) personal data collected, processed, sold, or 10    disclosed pursuant to the federal Farm Credit Act of 1971, 11    as amended, United States Code, Title 12, Sections 2001 to 12    2279cc, and implementing regulations, Code of Federal 13    Regulations, Title 12, Part 600, if the collection, 14    processing, sale, or disclosure is in compliance with that 15    law;16        (13) data collected or maintained:17            (A) in the course of an individual acting as a job 18        applicant to or an employee, owner, director, officer, 19        medical staff member, or contractor of a business if 20        the data is collected and used solely within the 21        context of the role;22            (B) as the emergency contact information of an 23        individual under item (1) if used solely for emergency 24        contact purposes; or25            (C) that is necessary for the business to retain 26        to administer benefits for another individual relating   SB2875- 16 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1        to the individual under item (1) if used solely for the 2        purposes of administering those benefits;3        (14) personal data collected, processed, sold, or 4    disclosed under the Illinois Insurance Code;5        (15) data collected, processed, sold, or disclosed as 6    part of a payment-only credit, check, or cash transaction 7    where no data about consumers, as defined in Section 11, 8    are retained;9        (16) a State or federally chartered bank or credit 10    union, or an affiliate or subsidiary that is principally 11    engaged in financial activities, as described in the 12    United States Code, Title 12, Section 1843(k);13        (17) information that originates from, or is 14    intermingled so as to be indistinguishable from, 15    information described in clause (8) and that a person 16    licensed under chapter 56 collects, processes, uses, or 17    maintains in the same manner as is required under the laws 18    and regulations specified in clause (8);19        (18) an insurance company and an insurance producer 20    that are regulated by the State under the Illinois 21    Insurance Code, a third-party administrator of 22    self-insurance, or an affiliate or subsidiary of any 23    entity identified in this clause that is principally 24    engaged in financial activities, as described in the 25    United States Code, Title 12, Section 1843(k), except that 26    this clause does not apply to a person that, alone or in   SB2875- 17 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1    combination with another person, establishes and maintains 2    a self-insurance program that does not otherwise engage in 3    the business of entering into policies of insurance;4        (19) a small business, as defined by the United States 5    Small Business Administration under the Code of Federal 6    Regulations, Title 13, Part 121, except that a small 7    business identified in this clause is subject to Section 8    17;9        (20) a nonprofit organization that is established to 10    detect and prevent fraudulent acts in connection with 11    insurance; and 12        (21) an air carrier subject to the federal Airline 13    Deregulation Act, Public Law 95-504, only to the extent 14    that an air carrier collects personal data related to 15    prices, routes, or services and only to the extent that 16    the provisions of the Airline Deregulation Act preempt the 17    requirements of this Act.18    Controllers that are in compliance with the Children's 19Online Privacy Protection Act, United States Code, Title 15, 20Sections 6501 to 6506, and implementing regulations, are 21deemed compliant with any obligation to obtain parental 22consent under this Act. 23    Section 13. Responsibility according to role. 24    (a) Controllers and processors are responsible for meeting 25the respective obligations established under this Act.  SB2875- 18 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1    (b) Processors are responsible under this Act for adhering 2to the instructions of the controller and assisting the 3controller to meet the controller's obligations under this 4Act. Assistance under this subsection shall include the 5following:6        (1) taking into account the nature of the processing, 7    the processor shall assist the controller by appropriate 8    technical and organizational measures, insofar as this is 9    possible, for the fulfillment of the controller's 10    obligation to respond to consumer requests to exercise 11    their rights under Section 14; and12        (2) taking into account the nature of processing and 13    the information available to the processor, the processor 14    shall assist the controller in meeting the controller's 15    obligations in relation to the security of processing the 16    personal data and in relation to the notification of a 17    breach of the security of the system under the Illinois 18    Personal Information Protection Act and provide 19    information to the controller necessary to enable the 20    controller to conduct and document any data privacy and 21    protection assessments required by Section 18.22    (c) A contract between a controller and a processor shall 23govern the processor's data processing procedures with respect 24to processing performed on behalf of the controller. The 25contract shall be binding and clearly set forth instructions 26for processing data, the nature and purpose of processing, the   SB2875- 19 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1type of data subject to processing, the duration of 2processing, and the rights and obligations of both parties. 3The contract shall also require that the processor:4        (1) ensure that each person processing the personal 5    data is subject to a duty of confidentiality with respect 6    to the data; and7        (2) engage a subcontractor only (i) after providing 8    the controller with an opportunity to object, and (ii) 9    pursuant to a written contract in accordance with 10    subsection (e) that requires the subcontractor to meet the 11    obligations of the processor with respect to the personal 12    data.13    (d) Taking into account the context of processing, the 14controller and the processor shall implement appropriate 15technical and organizational measures to ensure a level of 16security appropriate to the risk and establish a clear 17allocation of the responsibilities between the controller and 18the processor to implement the technical and organizational 19measures.20    (e) Processing by a processor shall be governed by a 21contract between the controller and the processor that is 22binding on both parties and that sets out the processing 23instructions to which the processor is bound, including the 24nature and purpose of the processing, the type of personal 25data subject to the processing, the duration of the 26processing, and the obligations and rights of both parties.   SB2875- 20 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1The contract shall include the requirements imposed by this 2subsection, subsections (c) and (d), as well as the following 3requirements:4        (1) at the choice of the controller, the processor 5    shall delete or return all personal data to the controller 6    as requested at the end of the provision of services, 7    unless retention of the personal data is required by law;8        (2) upon a reasonable request from the controller, the 9    processor shall make available to the controller all 10    information necessary to demonstrate compliance with the 11    obligations in this Act; and12        (3) the processor shall allow for, and contribute to, 13    reasonable assessments and inspections by the controller 14    or the controller's designated assessor. Alternatively, 15    the processor may arrange for a qualified and independent 16    assessor to conduct, at least annually and at the 17    processor's expense, an assessment of the processor's 18    policies and technical and organizational measures in 19    support of the obligations under this Act. The assessor 20    must use an appropriate and accepted control standard or 21    framework and assessment procedure for assessments as 22    applicable, and shall provide a report of an assessment to 23    the controller upon request.24    (f) In no event shall any contract relieve a controller or 25a processor from the liabilities imposed on a controller or 26processor by virtue of the controller's or processor's roles   SB2875- 21 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1in the processing relationship under this Act.2    (g) Determining whether a person is acting as a controller 3or processor with respect to a specific processing of data is a 4fact-based determination that depends upon the context in 5which personal data are to be processed. A person that is not 6limited in the person's processing of personal data pursuant 7to a controller's instructions, or that fails to adhere to a 8controller's instructions, is a controller and not a processor 9with respect to a specific processing of data. A processor 10that continues to adhere to a controller's instructions with 11respect to a specific processing of personal data remains a 12processor. If a processor begins, alone or jointly with 13others, determining the purposes and means of the processing 14of personal data, the processor is a controller with respect 15to the processing. 16    Section 14. Consumer personal data rights. 17    (a)(1) Consumer rights provided. Except as provided in 18this Act, a controller must comply with a request to exercise 19the consumer rights provided in this subdivision.20    (2) A consumer has the right to confirm whether or not a 21controller is processing personal data concerning the consumer 22and access the categories of personal data the controller is 23processing.24    (3) A consumer has the right to correct inaccurate 25personal data concerning the consumer taking into account the   SB2875- 22 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1nature of the personal data and the purposes of the processing 2of the personal data.3    (4) A consumer has the right to delete personal data 4concerning the consumer.5    (5) A consumer has the right to obtain personal data 6concerning the consumer, which the consumer previously 7provided to the controller, in a portable and, to the extent 8technically feasible, readily usable format that allows the 9consumer to transmit the data to another controller without 10hindrance, where the processing is carried out by automated 11means.12    (6) A consumer has the right to opt out of the processing 13of personal data concerning the consumer for purposes of 14targeted advertising, the sale of personal data, or profiling 15in furtherance of automated decisions that produce legal 16effects concerning a consumer or similarly significant effects 17concerning a consumer.18    (7) If a consumer's personal data is profiled in 19furtherance of decisions that produce legal effects concerning 20a consumer or similarly significant effects concerning a 21consumer, the consumer has the right to question the result of 22the profiling, to be informed of the reason that the profiling 23resulted in the decision, and, if feasible, to be informed of 24what actions the consumer might have taken to secure a 25different decision and the actions that the consumer might 26take to secure a different decision in the future. The   SB2875- 23 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1consumer has the right to review the consumer's personal data 2used in the profiling. If the decision is determined to have 3been based upon inaccurate personal data taking into account 4the nature of the personal data and the purposes of the 5processing of the personal data, the consumer has the right to 6have the data corrected and the profiling decision reevaluated 7based upon the corrected data.8    (8) A consumer has a right to obtain a list of the specific 9third parties to which the controller has disclosed the 10consumer's personal data. If the controller does not maintain 11the information in a format specific to the consumer, a list of 12specific third parties to whom the controller has disclosed 13any consumers' personal data may be provided instead.14    (b)(1) Exercising consumer rights. A consumer may exercise 15the rights set forth in this Section by submitting a request, 16at any time, to a controller specifying which rights the 17consumer wishes to exercise.18    (2) In the case of processing personal data concerning a 19known child, the parent or legal guardian of the known child 20may exercise the rights under this Act on the child's behalf.21    (3) In the case of processing personal data concerning a 22consumer legally subject to guardianship under the Probate Act 23of 1975, the guardian of the consumer may exercise the rights 24under this Act on the consumer's behalf.25    (4) A consumer may designate another person as the 26consumer's authorized agent to exercise the consumer's right   SB2875- 24 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1to opt out of the processing of the consumer's personal data 2for purposes of targeted advertising and sale under subsection 3(1), paragraph (f), on the consumer's behalf. A consumer may 4designate an authorized agent by way of, among other things, a 5technology, including, but not limited to, an Internet link or 6a browser setting, browser extension, or global device 7setting, indicating the consumer's intent to opt out of the 8processing. A controller shall comply with an opt-out request 9received from an authorized agent if the controller is able to 10verify, with commercially reasonable effort, the identity of 11the consumer and the authorized agent's authority to act on 12the consumer's behalf.13    (c)(1) Universal opt-out mechanisms. A controller must 14allow a consumer to opt out of any processing of the consumer's 15personal data for the purposes of targeted advertising, or any 16sale of the consumer's personal data through an opt-out 17preference signal sent, with the consumer's consent, by a 18platform, technology, or mechanism to the controller 19indicating the consumer's intent to opt out of the processing 20or sale. The platform, technology, or mechanism must:21        (A) not unfairly disadvantage another controller;22        (B) not make use of a default setting but require the 23    consumer to make an affirmative, freely given, and 24    unambiguous choice to opt out of the processing of the 25    consumer's personal data; 26        (C) be consumer-friendly and easy to use by the   SB2875- 25 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1    average consumer;2        (D) be as consistent as possible with any other 3    similar platform, technology, or mechanism required by any 4    federal or State law or regulation; and5        (E) enable the controller to accurately determine 6    whether the consumer is an Illinois resident and whether 7    the consumer has made a legitimate request to opt out of 8    any sale of the consumer's personal data or targeted 9    advertising. For purposes of this paragraph, the use of an 10    Internet protocol address to estimate the consumer's 11    location is sufficient to determine the consumer's 12    residence.13    (2) If a consumer's opt-out request is exercised through 14the platform, technology, or mechanism required under 15paragraph (a), and the request conflicts with the consumer's 16existing controller-specific privacy setting or voluntary 17participation in a controller's bona fide loyalty, rewards, 18premium features, discounts, or club card program, the 19controller must comply with the consumer's opt-out preference 20signal but may also notify the consumer of the conflict and 21provide the consumer a choice to confirm the 22controller-specific privacy setting or participation in the 23controller's program.24    (3) The platform, technology, or mechanism required under 25paragraph (a) is subject to the requirements of subdivision 4.26    (4) A controller that recognizes opt-out preference   SB2875- 26 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1signals that have been approved by other state laws or 2regulations is in compliance with this subdivision.3    (d)(1) Controller response to consumer requests. Except as 4provided in this Act, a controller must comply with a request 5to exercise the rights pursuant to subdivision 1.6    (2) A controller must provide one or more secure and 7reliable means for consumers to submit a request to exercise 8the consumer's rights under this Section. The means made 9available must take into account the ways in which consumers 10interact with the controller and the need for secure and 11reliable communication of the requests.12    (3) A controller may not require a consumer to create a new 13account to exercise a right, but a controller may require a 14consumer to use an existing account to exercise the consumer's 15rights under this Section.16    (4) A controller must comply with a request to exercise 17the right in subsection (1), paragraph (f), as soon as 18feasibly possible, but no later than 45 days of receipt of the 19request.20    (5) A controller must inform a consumer of any action 21taken on a request under subdivision 1 without undue delay and 22in any event within 45 days of receipt of the request. That 23period may be extended once by 45 additional days where 24reasonably necessary, taking into account the complexity and 25number of the requests. The controller must inform the 26consumer of any extension within 45 days of receipt of the   SB2875- 27 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1request, together with the reasons for the delay.2    (6) If a controller does not take action on a consumer's 3request, the controller must inform the consumer without undue 4delay and at the latest within 45 days of receipt of the 5request of the reasons for not taking action and instructions 6for how to appeal the decision with the controller as 7described in subdivision 5.8    (7) Information provided under this Section must be 9provided by the controller free of charge up to twice annually 10to the consumer. If requests from a consumer are manifestly 11unfounded or excessive, in particular because of the 12repetitive character of the requests, the controller may 13either charge a reasonable fee to cover the administrative 14costs of complying with the request or refuse to act on the 15request. The controller bears the burden of demonstrating the 16manifestly unfounded or excessive character of the request.17    (8) A controller is not required to comply with a request 18to exercise any of the rights under subsection (1), paragraphs 19(b) to (e) and (h), if the controller is unable to authenticate 20the request using commercially reasonable efforts. In such 21cases, the controller may request the provision of additional 22information reasonably necessary to authenticate the request. 23A controller is not required to authenticate an opt-out 24request, but a controller may deny an opt-out request if the 25controller has a good faith, reasonable, and documented belief 26that the request is fraudulent. If a controller denies an   SB2875- 28 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1opt-out request because the controller believes a request is 2fraudulent, the controller must notify the person who made the 3request that the request was denied because of the 4controller's belief that the request was fraudulent and state 5the controller's basis for that belief.6    (9) In response to a consumer request under subdivision 1, 7a controller must not disclose the following information about 8a consumer but must instead inform the consumer with 9sufficient particularity that the controller has collected 10that type of information:11        (A) Social Security number;12        (B) driver's license number or other government-issued 13    identification number;14        (C) financial account number;15        (D) health insurance account number or medical 16    identification number;17        (E) account password, security questions, or answers; 18    or19        (F) biometric data.20    (10) In response to a consumer request under subdivision 211, a controller is not required to reveal any trade secret.22    (11) A controller that has obtained personal data about a 23consumer from a source other than the consumer may comply with 24a consumer's request to delete the consumer's personal data 25pursuant to subsection (1), paragraph (d), by either:26        (A) retaining a record of the deletion request,   SB2875- 29 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1    retaining the minimum data necessary for the purpose of 2    ensuring the consumer's personal data remains deleted from 3    the business's records and not using the retained data for 4    any other purpose under the provisions of this Act; or5        (B) opting the consumer out of the processing of 6    personal data for any purpose except for the purposes 7    exempted pursuant to the provisions of this Act.8    (e)(1) Appeal process required. A controller must 9establish an internal process in which a consumer may appeal a 10refusal to take action on a request to exercise any of the 11rights under subdivision 1 within a reasonable period of time 12after the consumer's receipt of the notice sent by the 13controller under subdivision 4, paragraph (f).14    (2) The appeal process must be conspicuously available. 15The process must include the ease of use provisions in 16subdivision 3 applicable to submitting requests.17    (3) Within 45 days of receipt of an appeal, a controller 18must inform the consumer of any action taken or not taken in 19response to the appeal along with a written explanation of the 20reasons in support thereof. That period may be extended by 60 21additional days if reasonably necessary, taking into account 22the complexity and number of the requests serving as the basis 23for the appeal. The controller must inform the consumer of any 24extension within 45 days of receipt of the appeal together 25with the reasons for the delay.26    (4) When informing a consumer of any action taken or not   SB2875- 30 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1taken in response to an appeal pursuant to paragraph (c), the 2controller must provide a written explanation of the reasons 3for the controller's decision and clearly and prominently 4provide the consumer with information about how to file a 5complaint with the Attorney General. The controller must 6maintain records of all appeals and the controller's responses 7for at least 24 months and shall, upon written request by the 8Attorney General as part of an investigation, compile and 9provide a copy of the records to the Attorney General. 10    Section 15. Processing deidentified data or pseudonymous 11data. 12    (a) This Act does not require a controller or processor to 13do any of the following solely for purposes of complying with 14this Act:15        (1) reidentify deidentified data;16        (2) maintain data in identifiable form, or collect, 17    obtain, retain, or access any data or technology, to be 18    capable of associating an authenticated consumer request 19    with personal data; or20        (3) comply with an authenticated consumer request to 21    access, correct, delete, or port personal data under 22    Section 14, subsection (1), if all of the following are 23    true:24            (A) the controller is not reasonably capable of 25        associating the request with the personal data, or it   SB2875- 31 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1        would be unreasonably burdensome for the controller to 2        associate the request with the personal data;3            (B) the controller does not use the personal data 4        to recognize or respond to the specific consumer who 5        is the subject of the personal data or associate the 6        personal data with other personal data about the same 7        specific consumer; and8            (C) the controller does not sell the personal data 9        to any third party or otherwise voluntarily disclose 10        the personal data to any third party other than a 11        processor, except as otherwise permitted in this 12        Section.13    (b) The rights contained in Section 14, subsection (1), 14paragraphs (b) to (e) and (h), do not apply to pseudonymous 15data in cases where the controller is able to demonstrate any 16information necessary to identify the consumer is kept 17separately and is subject to effective technical and 18organizational controls that prevent the controller from 19accessing the information.20    (c) A controller that uses pseudonymous data or 21deidentified data must exercise reasonable oversight to 22monitor compliance with any contractual commitments to which 23the pseudonymous data or deidentified data are subject, and 24must take appropriate steps to address any breaches of 25contractual commitments.26    (d) A processor or third party must not attempt to   SB2875- 32 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1identify the subjects of deidentified or pseudonymous data 2without the express authority of the controller that caused 3the data to be deidentified or pseudonymized.4    (e) A controller, processor, or third party must not 5attempt to identify the subjects of data that has been 6collected with only pseudonymous identifiers. 7    Section 16. Responsibilities of controllers. 8    (a)(1) Transparency obligations. Controllers must provide 9consumers with a reasonably accessible, clear, and meaningful 10privacy notice that includes:11        (A) the categories of personal data processed by the 12    controller;13        (B) the purposes for which the categories of personal 14    data are processed;15        (C) an explanation of the rights contained in Section 16    14 and how and where consumers may exercise those rights, 17    including how a consumer may appeal a controller's action 18    with regard to the consumer's request;19        (D) the categories of personal data that the 20    controller sells to or shares with third parties, if any;21        (E) the categories of third parties, if any, with whom 22    the controller sells or shares personal data;23        (F) the controller's contact information, including an 24    active email address or other online mechanism that the 25    consumer may use to contact the controller;  SB2875- 33 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1        (G) a description of the controller's retention 2    policies for personal data; and3        (H) the date the privacy notice was last updated.4    (2) If a controller sells personal data to third parties, 5processes personal data for targeted advertising, or engages 6in profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal 7effects concerning a consumer or similarly significant effects 8concerning a consumer, the controller must disclose the 9processing in the privacy notice and provide access to a clear 10and conspicuous method outside the privacy notice for a 11consumer to opt out of the sale, processing, or profiling in 12furtherance of decisions that produce legal effects concerning 13a consumer or similarly significant effects concerning a 14consumer. This method may include but is not limited to an 15Internet hyperlink clearly labeled "Your Opt-Out Rights" or 16"Your Privacy Rights" that directly effectuates the opt-out 17request or takes consumers to a web page where the consumer can 18make the opt-out request.19    (3) The privacy notice must be made available to the 20public in each language in which the controller provides a 21product or service that is subject to the privacy notice or 22carries out activities related to the product or service.23    (4) The controller must provide the privacy notice in a 24manner that is reasonably accessible to and usable by 25individuals with disabilities.26    (5) Whenever a controller makes a material change to the   SB2875- 34 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1controller's privacy notice or practices, the controller must 2notify consumers affected by the material change with respect 3to any prospectively collected personal data and provide a 4reasonable opportunity for consumers to withdraw consent to 5any further materially different collection, processing, or 6transfer of previously collected personal data under the 7changed policy. The controller shall take all reasonable 8electronic measures to provide notification regarding material 9changes to affected consumers, taking into account available 10technology and the nature of the relationship.11    (6) A controller is not required to provide a separate 12Illinois-specific privacy notice or section of a privacy 13notice if the controller's general privacy notice contains all 14the information required by this Section.15    (7) The privacy notice must be posted online through a 16conspicuous hyperlink using the word "privacy" on the 17controller's website home page or on a mobile application's 18app store page or download page. A controller that maintains 19an application on a mobile or other device shall also include a 20hyperlink to the privacy notice in the application's settings 21menu or in a similarly conspicuous and accessible location. A 22controller that does not operate a website shall make the 23privacy notice conspicuously available to consumers through a 24medium regularly used by the controller to interact with 25consumers, including, but not limited to, mail.26    (b)(1) Use of data. A controller must limit the collection   SB2875- 35 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1of personal data to what is adequate, relevant, and reasonably 2necessary in relation to the purposes for which the data are 3processed, which must be disclosed to the consumer.4    (2) Except as provided in this Act, a controller may not 5process personal data for purposes that are not reasonably 6necessary to, or compatible with, the purposes for which the 7personal data are processed, as disclosed to the consumer, 8unless the controller obtains the consumer's consent.9    (3) A controller shall establish, implement, and maintain 10reasonable administrative, technical, and physical data 11security practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity, 12and accessibility of personal data, including the maintenance 13of an inventory of the data that must be managed to exercise 14these responsibilities. The data security practices shall be 15appropriate to the volume and nature of the personal data at 16issue.17    (4) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, a controller 18may not process sensitive data concerning a consumer without 19obtaining the consumer's consent, or, in the case of the 20processing of personal data concerning a known child, without 21obtaining consent from the child's parent or lawful guardian, 22in accordance with the requirement of the Children's Online 23Privacy Protection Act, United States Code, Title 15, Sections 246501 to 6506, and its implementing regulations.25    (5) A controller shall provide an effective mechanism for 26a consumer, or, in the case of the processing of personal data   SB2875- 36 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1concerning a known child, the child's parent or lawful 2guardian, to revoke previously given consent under this 3subsection. The mechanism provided shall be at least as easy 4as the mechanism by which the consent was previously given. 5Upon revocation of consent, a controller shall cease to 6process the applicable data as soon as practicable, but no 7later than 15 days after the receipt of the request.8    (6) A controller may not process the personal data of a 9consumer for purposes of targeted advertising, or sell the 10consumer's personal data, without the consumer's consent, 11under circumstances in which the controller knows that the 12consumer is between the ages of 13 and 16.13    (7) A controller may not retain personal data that is no 14longer relevant and reasonably necessary in relation to the 15purposes for which the data were collected and processed, 16unless retention of the data is otherwise required by law or 17permitted under Section 19.18    (c)(1) Nondiscrimination. A controller shall not process 19personal data on the basis of a consumer's or a class of 20consumers' actual or perceived race, color, ethnicity, 21religion, national origin, sex, gender, gender identity, 22sexual orientation, familial status, lawful source of income, 23or disability in a manner that unlawfully discriminates 24against the consumer or class of consumers with respect to the 25offering or provision of: housing, employment, credit, or 26education; or the goods, services, facilities, privileges,   SB2875- 37 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1advantages, or accommodations of any place of public 2accommodation.3    (2) A controller may not discriminate against a consumer 4for exercising any of the rights contained in this Act, 5including denying goods or services to the consumer, charging 6different prices or rates for goods or services, and providing 7a different level of quality of goods and services to the 8consumer. This subsection does not: (i) require a controller 9to provide a good or service that requires the consumer's 10personal data that the controller does not collect or 11maintain; or (ii) prohibit a controller from offering a 12different price, rate, level, quality, or selection of goods 13or services to a consumer, including offering goods or 14services for no fee, if the offering is in connection with a 15consumer's voluntary participation in a bona fide loyalty, 16rewards, premium features, discounts, or club card program.17    (d) Waiver of rights unenforceable. Any provision of a 18contract or agreement of any kind that purports to waive or 19limit in any way a consumer's rights under this Act is contrary 20to public policy and is void and unenforceable. 21    Section 17. Requirements for small businesses. 22    (a) A small business, as defined by the United States 23Small Business Administration under the Code of Federal 24Regulations, Title 13, Part 121, that conducts business in 25Illinois or produces products or services that are targeted to   SB2875- 38 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1Illinois residents must not sell a consumer's sensitive data 2without the consumer's prior consent.3    (b) Penalties and Attorney General enforcement procedures 4under Section 20 apply to a small business that violates this 5Section. 6    Section 18. Data privacy policies; data privacy and 7protection assessments. 8    (a) A controller must document and maintain a description 9of the policies and procedures the controller has adopted to 10comply with this Act. The description must include, where 11applicable:12        (1) the name and contact information for the 13    controller's chief privacy officer or other individual 14    with primary responsibility for directing the policies and 15    procedures implemented to comply with the provisions of 16    this Act; and17        (2) a description of the controller's data privacy 18    policies and procedures that reflect the requirements in 19    Section 16, and any policies and procedures designed to:20            (i) reflect the requirements of this Act in the 21        design of the controller's systems;22            (ii) identify and provide personal data to a 23        consumer as required by this Act;24            (iii) establish, implement, and maintain 25        reasonable administrative, technical, and physical   SB2875- 39 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1        data security practices to protect the 2        confidentiality, integrity, and accessibility of 3        personal data, including the maintenance of an 4        inventory of the data that must be managed to exercise 5        the responsibilities under this item;6            (iv) limit the collection of personal data to what 7        is adequate, relevant, and reasonably necessary in 8        relation to the purposes for which the data are 9        processed;10            (v) prevent the retention of personal data that is 11        no longer relevant and reasonably necessary in 12        relation to the purposes for which the data were 13        collected and processed, unless retention of the data 14        is otherwise required by law or permitted under 15        Section 19; and16            (vi) identify and remediate violations of this 17        Act.18    (b) A controller must conduct and document a data privacy 19and protection assessment for each of the following processing 20activities involving personal data:21        (1) the processing of personal data for purposes of 22    targeted advertising;23        (2) the sale of personal data;24        (3) the processing of sensitive data;25        (4) any processing activities involving personal data 26    that present a heightened risk of harm to consumers; and  SB2875- 40 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1        (5) the processing of personal data for purposes of 2    profiling, where the profiling presents a reasonably 3    foreseeable risk of:4            (i) unfair or deceptive treatment of, or disparate 5        impact on, consumers;6            (ii) financial, physical, or reputational injury 7        to consumers;8            (iii) a physical or other intrusion upon the 9        solitude or seclusion, or the private affairs or 10        concerns, of consumers, where the intrusion would be 11        offensive to a reasonable person; or12            (iv) other substantial injury to consumers.13    (c) A data privacy and protection assessment must take 14into account the type of personal data to be processed by the 15controller, including the extent to which the personal data 16are sensitive data, and the context in which the personal data 17are to be processed.18    (d) A data privacy and protection assessment must identify 19and weigh the benefits that may flow directly and indirectly 20from the processing to the controller, consumer, other 21stakeholders, and the public against the potential risks to 22the rights of the consumer associated with the processing, as 23mitigated by safeguards that can be employed by the controller 24to reduce the potential risks. The use of deidentified data 25and the reasonable expectations of consumers, as well as the 26context of the processing and the relationship between the   SB2875- 41 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1controller and the consumer whose personal data will be 2processed, must be factored into this assessment by the 3controller.4    (e) A data privacy and protection assessment must include 5the description of policies and procedures required by 6subsection (a).7    (f) As part of a civil investigative demand, the Attorney 8General may request, in writing, that a controller disclose 9any data privacy and protection assessment that is relevant to 10an investigation conducted by the Attorney General. The 11controller must make a data privacy and protection assessment 12available to the Attorney General upon a request made under 13this subsection. The Attorney General may evaluate the data 14privacy and protection assessments for compliance with this 15Act. Data privacy and protection assessments is nonpublic data 16that is data required by State or federal law that is: (1) not 17about an individual; (2) not accessible by the general public; 18and (3) accessible by the subject of the data. The disclosure. 19The disclosure of a data privacy and protection assessment 20under a request from the Attorney General under this 21subsection does not constitute a waiver of the attorney-client 22privilege or work product protection with respect to the 23assessment and any information contained in the assessment.24    (g) Data privacy and protection assessments or risk 25assessments conducted by a controller for the purpose of 26compliance with other laws or regulations may qualify under   SB2875- 42 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1this Section if the assessments have a similar scope and 2effect.3    (h) A single data protection assessment may address 4multiple sets of comparable processing operations that include 5similar activities. 6    Section 19. Limitations and applicability. 7    (a) The obligations imposed on controllers or processors 8under this Act do not restrict a controller's or a processor's 9ability to:10        (1) comply with federal, State, or local laws, rules, 11    or regulations, including, but not limited to, data 12    retention requirements in State or federal law 13    notwithstanding a consumer's request to delete personal 14    data;15        (2) comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory 16    inquiry, investigation, subpoena, or summons by federal, 17    State, local, or other governmental authorities;18        (3) cooperate with law enforcement agencies concerning 19    conduct or activity that the controller or processor 20    reasonably and in good faith believes may violate federal, 21    State, or local laws, rules, or regulations;22        (4) investigate, establish, exercise, prepare for, or 23    defend legal claims;24        (5) provide a product or service specifically 25    requested by a consumer; perform a contract to which the   SB2875- 43 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1    consumer is a party, including fulfilling the terms of a 2    written warranty; or take steps at the request of the 3    consumer prior to entering into a contract;4        (6) take immediate steps to protect an interest that 5    is essential for the life or physical safety of the 6    consumer or of another natural person, and if the 7    processing cannot be manifestly based on another legal 8    basis;9        (7) prevent, detect, protect against, or respond to 10    security incidents, identity theft, fraud, harassment, 11    malicious or deceptive activities, or any illegal 12    activity; preserve the integrity or security of systems; 13    or investigate, report, or prosecute those responsible for 14    any such action;15        (8) assist another controller, processor, or third 16    party with any of the obligations under this subsection;17        (9) engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, 18    historical, or statistical research in the public interest 19    that adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy 20    laws and is approved, monitored, and governed by an 21    institutional review board, human subjects research ethics 22    review board, or a similar independent oversight entity 23    that has determined:24            (A) the research is likely to provide substantial 25        benefits that do not exclusively accrue to the 26        controller;  SB2875- 44 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1            (B) the expected benefits of the research outweigh 2        the privacy risks; and3            (C) the controller has implemented reasonable 4        safeguards to mitigate privacy risks associated with 5        research, including any risks associated with 6        reidentification; or7        (10) process personal data for the benefit of the 8    public in the areas of public health, community health, or 9    population health, but only to the extent that the 10    processing is:11            (A) subject to suitable and specific measures to 12        safeguard the rights of the consumer whose personal 13        data is being processed; and14            (B) under the responsibility of a professional 15        individual who is subject to confidentiality 16        obligations under federal, State, or local law.17    (b) The obligations imposed on controllers or processors 18under this Act do not restrict a controller's or processor's 19ability to collect, use, or retain data to:20        (1) effectuate a product recall or identify and repair 21    technical errors that impair existing or intended 22    functionality;23        (2) perform internal operations that are reasonably 24    aligned with the expectations of the consumer based on the 25    consumer's existing relationship with the controller, or 26    are otherwise compatible with processing in furtherance of   SB2875- 45 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1    the provision of a product or service specifically 2    requested by a consumer or the performance of a contract 3    to which the consumer is a party; or4        (3) conduct internal research to develop, improve, or 5    repair products, services, or technology.6    (c) The obligations imposed on controllers or processors 7under this Act do not apply if compliance by the controller or 8processor with this Act would violate an evidentiary privilege 9under Illinois law and do not prevent a controller or 10processor from providing personal data concerning a consumer 11to a person covered by an evidentiary privilege under Illinois 12law as part of a privileged communication.13    (d) A controller or processor that discloses personal data 14to a third-party controller or processor in compliance with 15the requirements of this Act is not in violation of this Act if 16the recipient processes the personal data in violation of this 17Act, provided that at the time of disclosing the personal 18data, the disclosing controller or processor did not have 19actual knowledge that the recipient intended to commit a 20violation. A third-party controller or processor receiving 21personal data from a controller or processor in compliance 22with the requirements of this Act is not in violation of this 23Act for the obligations of the controller or processor from 24which the third-party controller or processor receives the 25personal data.26    (e) Obligations imposed on controllers and processors   SB2875- 46 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1under this Act shall not:2        (1) adversely affect the rights or freedoms of any 3    persons, including exercising the right of free speech 4    pursuant to the First Amendment of the United States 5    Constitution; or6        (2) apply to the processing of personal data by a 7    natural person in the course of a purely personal or 8    household activity.9    (f) Personal data that are processed by a controller 10pursuant to this Section may be processed solely to the extent 11that the processing is:12        (1) necessary, reasonable, and proportionate to the 13    purposes listed in this Section;14        (2) adequate, relevant, and limited to what is 15    necessary in relation to the specific purpose or purposes 16    listed in this Section; and17        (3) insofar as possible, taking into account the 18    nature and purpose of processing the personal data, 19    subjected to reasonable administrative, technical, and 20    physical measures to protect the confidentiality, 21    integrity, and accessibility of the personal data, and to 22    reduce reasonably foreseeable risks of harm to consumers.23    (g) If a controller processes personal data pursuant to an 24exemption in this Section, the controller bears the burden of 25demonstrating that the processing qualifies for the exemption 26and complies with the requirements in subsection (f).  SB2875- 47 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1    (h) Processing personal data solely for the purposes 2expressly identified in subsection (a), clauses (1) to (7), 3does not, by itself, make an entity a controller with respect 4to the processing. 5    Section 20. Attorney General enforcement. 6    (a) If a controller or processor violates this Act, the 7Attorney General, before filing an enforcement action under 8subsection (b), must provide the controller or processor with 9a warning letter identifying the specific provisions of this 10Act the Attorney General alleges have been or are being 11violated. If, after 30 days of issuance of the warning letter, 12the Attorney General believes the controller or processor has 13failed to cure any alleged violation, the Attorney General may 14bring an enforcement action under subsection (b). This 15subsection expires January 1, 2028.16    (b) The Attorney General may bring a civil action against 17a controller or processor to enforce a provision of this Act. 18If the State prevails in an action to enforce this Act, the 19State may, in addition to penalties provided by subsection (c) 20or other remedies provided by law, be allowed an amount 21determined by the court to be the reasonable value of all or 22part of the State's litigation expenses incurred.23    (c) Any controller or processor that violates this Act is 24subject to an injunction and liable for a civil penalty of not 25more than $7,500 for each violation.  SB2875- 48 -LRB104 17139 JRC 30558 b1    (d) Nothing in this Act establishes a private right of 2action for a violation of this Act or any other law. 3    Section 95. Home rule. A unit of local government, 4including a home rule unit, may not regulate consumer data 5privacy. This Section is a denial and limitation of home rule 6powers and functions under subsection (g) of Section 6 of 7Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 8    Section 97. Severability. If any provision of this Act or 9its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, 10the invalidity of that provision or application does not 11affect other provisions or applications of this Act that can 12be given effect without the invalid provision or application.